Massachusetts, session 194th, H1758.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The general court hereby finds and declares that the provisions of this act
will elevate the standard of accountability principally against the commonwealth, for an
erroneous conviction resulting in incarceration.
SECTION 2. Section 5 of chapter 258D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (A) and inserting in place thereof
the following subsection:-
(A) Upon a finding or verdict that the claimant has met the requirements of section 1 by
the requisite standard of proof and is not barred from compensation by section 2, the court or the
jury shall determine the damages that shall be payable to the claimant. In making such
determination, the court or jury shall consider, but not be limited to, the consideration of: the
of 2

income the claimant would have earned, but for his incarceration; the particular circumstances of
the claimant's trial and other proceedings; the length and conditions under which the claimant
was incarcerated and; any other factors deemed appropriate under the circumstances in order to
fairly and reasonably compensate the claimant. The court, in its discretion, may admit expert
testimony on these or any factors. The court may include, as part of its judgment against the
commonwealth, an order requiring the commonwealth to provide the claimant with services that
are reasonable and necessary to address any deficiencies in the individual's physical and
emotional condition and waive tuition and fees for the claimant for any educational services from
a state or community college in the commonwealth including, but not limited to, the University
of Massachusetts at Amherst and its satellite campuses. Once the damages have been
determined, the court shall enter a judgment against the commonwealth for the claimant in an
amount certain, payable in either a lump sum or in annuity installment payments set by the court;
provided, however, that any such annuity installment payments shall have fixed limits on their
annual amount and on the time period which they shall be paid to the claimant. A judgment
against the commonwealth may not include punitive or exemplary damages. The total liability of
the commonwealth for any judgment entered under this chapter shall be a minimum of $800,000.
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the clerk of court shall not add to the
judgment and the commonwealth shall not be liable for paying, any prejudgment or post
judgment interest on damages. Subject to section 4, relative to award or settlements, the rights
and remedies afforded to certain individuals by this chapter are not intended to limit in any way
any rights or remedies that such individuals or other individuals may be entitled to exercise and
pursue under chapter 258.
of 2